Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Shooting Ranges

237.200.
Definitions for KRS 237.210 and 237.220.

As used in KRS

237.210

and

237.220

:

“Shooting range” or “range” means an area designated and operated by a person for the shooting of firearms and not available for that use by the general public without payment of a fee, membership contribution, or dues, or by invitation of an authorized person; or any area so designated and operated by a unit of government, regardless of the terms of admission thereto.

“Unit of government” means any of the departments of state government or political subdivisions of the state, cities, counties, urban-counties, or charter counties, or any of their respective departments, agencies, or authorities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 8, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

237.210.
Effect of changed conditions on nuisance actions involving shooting ranges — Standing to sue — Limitation of liability — Prohibition against retroactive application of laws.

No shooting range shall be or shall become a nuisance, either public or private, solely as a result of changed conditions in or around the locality of the range if the range has been in operation for one (1) year since the date on which it commenced operation as a shooting range. Subsequent physical expansion of the range or expansion of the types of firearms in use at the range shall not establish a new date of commencement of operations for purposes of this section unless the change triples the amount of the noise produced by the shooting range. The increase in the noise level at the shooting range shall be measured by an independent testing agency or a unit of government and shall compare the highest noise levels during any one (1) month during which the range is in full operation with a subsequent month in which the range is in full operation and conducting a comparable level of shooting activities. Only a person who lives adjacent to the shooting range shall have standing to bring an action under this section.

No shooting range or unit of government or person owning, operating, or using a shooting range for the shooting of firearms shall be subject to any action for civil or criminal liability, damages, abatement, or injunctive relief resulting from or relating to noise generated by the operation of the range if the range remains in compliance with noise control or nuisance abatement administrative regulations, statutes, or ordinances applicable to the range on the date on which it commenced operation.

No administrative regulations, statutes, or ordinances relating to noise control, noise pollution, or noise abatement adopted or enacted by a unit of government shall be applied retroactively to prohibit conduct at a shooting range, which conduct was lawful and being engaged in prior to the adoption or enactment of the administrative regulations, statutes, or ordinances.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 8, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

237.220.
Retroactivity of KRS 237.200 and 237.210.

The provisions of KRS

237.200

and

237.210

shall be retroactive and shall apply to covered actions either before, on, or after July 15, 1998.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 8, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.